DI-40
DIAGNOSTICS - AUTOMATIC TRANSMISSION (A343F)

DI3RX-01

DTC P0773/64 | Shift Solenoid E Electrical Malfunction

(SL Solenoid Valve)
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The SL solenoid valve is turned ON and OFF by signals from the Engine and ECT ECU to control the hydrau-
licpressureactingonthelock  —uprelayvalve, whichthen controls operation ofthe lock —up clutch.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Either (a) or (b) is detected for 1 time.
(a) Solenoidresistanceis8 Q orless (shortcircuit) whenthe ¢ Openorshortin SLsolenoid valve circuit
P0773/64 solenoidis energized.  SLsolenoid valve
(b) Solenoidresistanceis 100k  Q ormore (open circuit) when ¢ Engineand ECT ECU
the solenoid is not energized.

Fail safe function
If the Engine and ECT ECU detects a malfunction, it turns the SL solenoid valve OFF.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Measure resistance between terminal SL of Engine and ECT ECU and body
ground.

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment door
(See page BO-127).
(b) Disconnect the connector from Engine and ECT ECU.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal SL of Engine and ECT
ECU and body ground.
OK:
DO1658 Resistance: 11 -15 Qat20 °C (68 °F)

(See page IN-35).

0K> Check and replace the Engine and ECT ECU
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2 [ Check harness and connector between Engine and ECT ECU and automatic
transmission solenoid connector.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the solenoid connector from the transmission.
CHECK:
Check the harness between terminal SL of Engine and ECT
ECU and terminal SL of transmission solenoid connector.
OK:

There is no open or short circuit.

D01667

NG> Repair or replace the harness or connector.
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Check SL solenoid valve.

Q08222
Q08224
D00081

@

Electrical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@) Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the SL solenoid valve.

CHECK:

(@) Measure resistance between terminal SL of solenoid
valve and solenoid body.

(b) Connectpositive @ lead ofthe batterytoterminal of sole-
noid connector, negative & lead ofthe batteryto solenoid
body.

OK:

(1) Resistance: 11-1 5Qat20 °C(68 °F)
(2) The SL solenoid valve makes operating noise.

Mechanical Check:

PREPARATION:

(@ Jack up the vehicle.

(b) Remove the oil pan.

(c) Disconnect the solenoid connector.

(d) Remove the SL solenoid valve.

CHECK: 5

(@) Applying 490 kPa (5 kgf/cm , 71 psi) of compressed air,
checkthatthe solenoid valve does notleak air.

(b)  When battery positive voltage is supplied to the solenoid
valve, check that the solenoid valve opens.

OK:

(a) Solenoid valve does not leak air
(b) Solenoid valve opens

NG> Replace the SL solenoid valve.

Repair or replace the solenoid wire.
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